Hawaii statutes.
[§654-9] Other remedies not affected.
The remedy provided by this chapter shall be in addition to, and shall not be
deemed to affect, any other remedy. [L Sp 1949, c 7, pt of §1; RL 1955,
§244-29; HRS §654-30; am L 1972, c 90, §1(g); ren HRS §654-9]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next